tables/liblouis/tables/translation/_translation_ru-g1.ctb
# Braille indicators
numsign 3456  number sign, just a dots operand
capsign 45
begital 456 
firstwordital 456

# the decimal digits
litdigit 1 1
litdigit 2 12
litdigit 3 14
litdigit 4 145
litdigit 5 15
litdigit 6 124
litdigit 7 1245
litdigit 8 125
litdigit 9 24
litdigit 0 245


largesign \x00C0 4-1      [C0] upper a grave
largesign \x00E0   4-1      [E0] lower a grave
largesign \x00C1 4-1      [C1] upper a acute
largesign \x00E1   4-1      [E1] lower a acute
largesign \x00C2 4-1      [C2] upper a circumflex
largesign \x00E2   4-1      [E2] lower a circumflex
largesign \x00C3 4-1      [C3] upper a tilde
largesign \x00E3   4-1      [E3] lower a tilde
largesign \x00C4 4-1      [C4] upper a dieresis
largesign \x00E4   4-1      [E4] lower a dieresis

largesign \x00C5 4-1      [C5] upper a ring
largesign \x00E5   4-1      [E5] lower a ring

largesign \x00C6 1-15     [C6] upper ae
largesign \x00E6   1-15			[E6] lower ae

largesign \x00C7 4-14     [C7] upper c cedilla
largesign \x00E7   4-14     [E7] lower c cedilla

largesign \x00C8 4-15     [C8] upper e grave
largesign \x00E8   4-15     [E8] lower e grave

largesign \x00C9 4-15     [C9] upper e acute
largesign \x00E9   4-15     [E9] lower e acute

largesign \x00CA 4-15     [CA] upper e circumflex
largesign \x00EA   4-15     [EA] lower e circumflex

largesign \x00CB 4-15     [CB] upper e dieresis
largesign \x00EB   4-15     [EB] lower e dieresis

largesign \x00CC 4-24     [CC] upper i grave
largesign \x00EC   4-24     [EC] lower i grave

largesign \x00CD 4-24     [CD] upper i acute
largesign \x00ED   4-24     [ED] lower i acute

largesign \x00CE 4-24     [CE] upper i circumflex
largesign \x00EE   4-24     [EE] lower i circumflex

largesign \x00CF 4-24     [CF] upper i dieresis
largesign \x00EF   4-24     [EF] lower i dieresis

largesign \x00D0 4-15     [D0] upper eth
largesign \x00F0   4-15     [F0] lower eth

largesign \x00D1 4-1345   [D1] upper n tilde
largesign \x00F1   4-1345   [F1] lower n tilde

largesign \x00D2 4-135    [D2] upper o grave
largesign \x00F2   4-135    [F2] lower o grave

largesign \x00D3 4-135    [D3] upper o acute
largesign \x00F3   4-135    [F3] lower o acute

largesign \x00D4 4-135    [D4] upper o circumflex
largesign \x00F4   4-135    [F4] lower o circumflex

largesign \x00D5 4-135    [D5] upper o tilde
largesign \x00F5   4-135    [F5] lower o tilde

largesign \x00D6 4-135    [D6] upper o dieresis
largesign \x00F6   4-135			[F6] lower o dieresis

largesign \x00D8 4-135    [D8] upper o slash
largesign \x00f8   4-135    [F8] lower o slash

largesign \x00D9 4-136    [D9] upper u grave
largesign \x00F9   4-136    [F9] lower u grave

largesign \x00DA 4-136    [DA] upper u acute
largesign \x00FA   4-136    [FA] lower u acute

largesign \x00DB 4-136    [DB] upper u circumflex
largesign \x00FB   4-136    [FB] lower u circumflex

largesign \x00DC 4-136    [DC] upper u dieresis
largesign \x00FC   4-136    [FC] lower u dieresis

largesign \x00DD 4-13456  [DD] upper y acute
largesign \x00FD   4-13456  [FD] lower y acute

largesign \x00DE 4-2345   [DE] upper t horn
largesign \x00FE   4-2345   [FE] lower t horn

largesign \x00DF 234-234 (DF) lower ss

largesign \x0174 4-2456 lower w circumflex
largesign \x0175 4-2456 upper w circumflex

largesign \x0176 4-13456 upper y circumflex
largesign \x0177 4-13456 lower y circumflex

largesign \x0178 4-13456 upper y with dieresis
largesign \x00FF 4-13456 lower y with dieresis

largesign \x1EF2 4-13456 upper y with grave
largesign \x1EF3 4-13456 lower y with grave


prepunc ( 126
postpunc ) 345
begword ` 6-236
prepunc " 236
postpunc " 356
always \x00AB 236 (opening quotation mark) 
always \x00BB 356 (closing quotation mark)
prepunc ' 6-236
postpunc ' 356-3
#word 'em = 
#word 'tis =
#word 'twas =
begnum # 1345 print number sign before number
begnum ° 145-1245 degrees sign
endnum ° 56-145-1245 ;dg degrees sign
begnum  \x20AC 15       # euro sign at beginning of number
endnum  \x20AC 4-15       # euro sign atend  of number
postpunc , 2
hyphen - 36
#capsnocont
postpunc . 256
postpunc ; 23
postpunc : 25
postpunc ! 235
always / 34
always < 5-13
always > 46-2
postpunc ? 26
midnum + 0-235-3456
always + 235
endnum % 3456-245-356 
always ^ 4
always ~ 12456
always & 12346
always * 35
midword \x2019 3	# stupid smart apostrophe
always [ 45
always ] 3456
always { 46
always } 6
prepunc ` 6-236
always @ 146
always \\ 456-16
always | 456
repeated \s 0
repeated \t 0
always ... 256-256-256
always .\s.\s. 256-256-256 . . .
always $ 256-3456
